Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.884

[Art. 146] Uniformity of interpretation.

This chapter shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it and, so far as practical, to make that law uniform with the law of the United States.

[ 1963 c 220 s 131.]